sl-SI: Oblika ovoja ventila basovske pozavne: Aksialni pretok; Odprto ovijanje; Tradicionalno/zaprto ovijanje; Drugo
sv: Bastrombonens ventilomslagsstil: Axial flow-ventil; Open wrap; Traditionell/stängd ventil; Övrigt
en: Bass trombone valve wrap style: Axial flow wrap; Open wrap; Traditional/closed wrap; Other
fi: Bassopasuunan venttiilien tyyppi.: Aksiaalinen venttiiliputkisto; Avoin putkisto; Perinteinen / suljettu putkisto; Muu
th: รูปแบบการจัดวางท่อวาล์วของทรอมโบนเบส: Axial flow wrap; Open wrap; Traditional/Closed wrap; อื่นๆ
it: Stile di avvolgimento delle valvole del trombone basso: Ritorta a flusso assiale; Ritorta aperta; Ritorta tradizionale/chiusa; Altro
lt-LT: Bosinio trombono vožtuvo apvyniojimo stilius: Ašinio srauto vožtuvų sistema; Atviroji vožtuvų sistema; Tradicinė / uždaroji vožtuvų sistema; Kita
pt-BR: Estilo de revestimento das válvulas do trombone baixo: Enrolamento de fluxo axial; Enrolamento aberto; Tradicional/fechada; Outros
ko: 베이스 트롬본 밸브 랩 스타일: 액시얼 플로우 랩; 오픈 랩; 전통적/클로즈드 랩; 기타
nl: Bastrombone ventielwrap stijl: Axial flow wrap; Open wrap; Traditionele/gesloten wrap; Overig
cs: Typ vinutí ventilového systému basového pozounu: Axial flow (kónické vedení); Open wrap (široké vedení); Tradiční / closed wrap; Jiné
ja: バストロンボーンのバルブラップスタイル: アキシャルフロウラップ; オープンラップ; トラディショナル/クローズドラップ; その他
hu: Basszusharsona-szelep wrapjének kialakítása: Axial flow szelep; Nyitott csövezés; Hagyományos/zárt csövezés; Egyéb
ru: Стиль обмотки клапанов бас-тромбона: С аксиальным клапаном; Открытая крона; Традиционная / закрытая крона; Другое
sk-SK: Model basového trombónu s ventilovým závitom: Axiálne vinutie; Otvorené vinutie; Tradičné/uzavreté vinutie; Iné
nb: Basstrombone ventilomslagsstil: Aksialventil; Åpen rørføring; Tradisjonell / lukket rørføring; Annet
da: Ventilindpakning på basbasun: Axial flow-wrap; Open wrap; Traditionelt/lukket wrap; Andet
zh-CN: 低音长号阀门绕管样式: 轴流式绕管; 开放式绕管; 传统/封闭式绕管; 其他
pl: Styl owinięcia zaworów puzonu basowego: Axial flow; Open wrap; Tradycyjny/closed wrap; Inne
tr: Bas trombon valf sargı tipi: Axial flow sarım; Açık sarım; Geleneksel/kapalı sarım; Diğer
es: Estilo de envoltura de la válvula del trombón bajo: Envoltura de flujo axial; Envoltura abierta; Envoltura tradicional/cerrada; Otro
vi: Kiểu bọc van kèn trombone bass: Thiết kế ống xoắn Axial Flow; Thiết kế ống mở; Thiết kế ống truyền thống/đóng; Khác
fr: Configuration des tubes de valve du trombone basse: Circuit à flux axial; Circuit ouvert; Circuit traditionnel/fermé; Autre
hr-HR: Stil ventilne petlje bas-trombona: Cijev s aksijalnim protokom; Otvorena cijev; Tradicionalna / zatvorena cijev; Ostalo
zh-TW: 低音長號轉閥繞管樣式: 軸流式 (Axial flow wrap); 開放式管身設計; 傳統/封閉式管身設計; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на разположение на клапанната система на бас тромбона: Аксиален поток; Отворен тип; Традиционен/затворен тип; Друго
pt-PT: Estilo de enrolamento da válvula do trombone baixo: Enrolamento de fluxo axial; Enrolamento aberto; Enrolamento tradicional/fechado; Outro
ro-RO: Stil de înfășurare a supapei trombonului bas: Circuit de flux axial; Circuit deschis; Tradițional/circuit închis; Altele
de: Bauart des Ventilverlaufs der Bassposaune: Axial-Flow-Bauweise; Offene Bauweise; Traditionelle/geschlossene Bauweise; Sonstige
el: Στυλ περιτύλιξης βαλβίδας μπάσου τρομπονιού: Περιέλιξη αξονικής ροής; Ανοιχτή περιέλιξη; Παραδοσιακή / κλειστή περιέλιξη; Άλλο